California statutes. Public Utilities Code
The agreement to purchase or lease may direct the vendor or lessor to sell and assign or lease the rolling equipment to a bank or trust company duly authorized to transact business in the state as trustee, for the benefit and security of the equipment trust certificates and may direct the trustee to deliver the rolling equipment to one or more designated officers of the district and may authorize the district to execute and deliver simultaneously therewith an installment purchase agreement or a lease of the equipment to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105232.

The agreements and leases shall be duly acknowledged before a person authorized by law to take acknowledgments of deeds and in the form required for acknowledgment of deeds. The agreements, leases, and equipment trust certificates shall be authorized by resolution of the district and shall contain the covenants, conditions, and provisions deemed necessary or appropriate to insure the payment of the equipment trust certificates from legally available sources of funds specified in the certificates.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105233.

The covenants, conditions, and provisions of the agreements, leases, and equipment trust certificates shall not conflict with any of the provisions of any trust agreement securing the payment of bonds, notes, or certificates of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Improvement Acts and Special Benefit Districts [105240. - 105241.]

105240.

The Improvement Act of 1911 (Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 7 of the Streets and Highways Code), the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Division 12 of the Streets and Highways Code), and the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 (Part 1 (commencing with Section 8500) of Division 10 of the Streets and Highways Code) are applicable to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105241.

The provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 99000) of Part 11 of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code are applicable to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Temporary Borrowing [105250. - 105251.]

105250.

The district may borrow money in accordance with the provisions of Article 7 (commencing with Section 53820), or of Article 7.6 (commencing with Section 53850) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105251.

The district may borrow money in anticipation of the sale of bonds that have been authorized to be issued, but have not been sold and delivered, and may issue negotiable bond anticipation notes therefor and may renew the same from time to time. The maximum maturity of those notes, including the renewals thereof, shall not exceed five years from the date of delivery of the original notes. The notes may be paid from any moneys of the district available therefor and not otherwise pledged. If not previously otherwise paid, the notes shall be paid from the proceeds
 of the next sale of the bonds of the district in anticipation of which they were issued. The notes shall not be issued in any amount in excess of the aggregate amount of bonds which the district has been authorized to issue, less the amount of any bonds of that authorized issue previously sold, and also less the amount of other bond anticipation notes therefor issued and then outstanding. The notes shall be issued and sold in the same manner as the bonds. The notes and the resolution or resolutions authorizing them may contain any provisions, conditions, or limitations that a resolution of the district authorizing the issuance of bonds may contain.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Miscellaneous [105260. - 105262.]

105260.

The district may bring an action to determine the validity of any of its bonds, equipment trust certificates, warrants, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105261.

All bonds and other evidences of indebtedness issued by the district under the provisions of this part, and the interest thereon, are free and exempt from all taxation within the state, except for transfer, franchise, inheritance, and estate taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105262.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this part or any other law, the provisions of all ordinances, resolutions, and other proceedings in the issuance by the district of any bonds, bonds with a pledge of revenues, bonds for improvement districts, revenue bonds, equipment trust certificates, notes, or any and all evidences of indebtedness or liability shall constitute a contract between the district and the holders of the bonds, equipment trust certificates, notes, or evidences of indebtedness or liability and the provisions thereof shall be enforceable
 against the district, or any or all of its successors or assigns, by mandamus or any other appropriate suit, action, or proceeding in law or in equity in any court of competent jurisdiction. Nothing contained in this part or in any other law shall be held to relieve the district or the territory included within it from any bonded or other debt or liability contracted by the district. Upon dissolution of the district or upon withdrawal of territory therefrom, the property formerly included within the district or withdrawn therefrom shall continue to be liable for the payment of all bonded and other indebtedness or liabilities outstanding at the time of the dissolution or withdrawal the same as if the district had not been so dissolved or the territory withdrawn therefrom, and it shall be the duty of the successors or assigns to provide for the payment of the bonded and other indebtedness and liabilities. Except as may be otherwise provided in the proceedings for the authorization, issuance, and sale of any
 revenue bonds, bonds secured by a pledge of revenues or bonds for improvement districts secured by a pledge of revenues, revenues of any kind or nature derived from any revenue-producing improvements, works, facilities, or property owned, operated or controlled by the district shall be pledged, charged, assigned, and have a lien thereon for the payment of the bonds as long as they are outstanding, regardless of any change in ownership, operation, or control of those revenue-producing improvements, works, facilities, or property and it shall, in such later event or events, be the duty of the successors or assigns to continue to maintain and operate the revenue-producing improvements, works, facilities, or property as long as bonds are outstanding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Annexation [105280. - 105288.]

105280.

Territory may be annexed to the district in the manner provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105281.

A county contiguous to the district may, by majority vote of the board of supervisors of that county, petition the district to annex all or part of the territory within the county. Alternatively, the board of the district may propose annexation of any territory contiguous to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105282.

If annexation is proposed pursuant to Section 105281, the board shall determine whether the additional territory proposed to be annexed will be benefited by annexation to the district, and shall pass a resolution to that effect. The resolution shall be passed by a vote of two-thirds of the members of the board and be approved by the board of supervisors of the county in which the territory is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105283.

The board of supervisors of the county in which the territory to be annexed is situated shall agree in writing with the board of directors of the district upon the terms and conditions of annexation. The agreement may provide for the levy and collection of special taxes within the county in addition to the taxes elsewhere provided for in this part, the fixing of rates, rentals, and charges differing from those fixed or existing elsewhere within the district, the incurring or assumption of indebtedness, the making of a payment or payments, or the transfer of
 property, real and personal, and other assets to the district by the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105284.

The resolution shall:

(a) Describe the boundaries of the territory proposed to be annexed.

(b) Designate the proposed annexation by an appropriate name.

(c) Declare that the area to be annexed to the district will be benefited by annexation.

(d) Name the time and place for the hearing of objections by any
 person interested in the proposed annexation.

(e) Describe any terms and conditions of annexation agreed to between the district and the county pursuant to Section 105283.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105285.

The resolution, together with the names of the members of the board voting for and against it, shall be published pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in a newspaper published in the territory proposed to be annexed, or if there is no paper, then in some newspaper of general circulation, circulated in the territory.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105286.

On the day fixed for hearing or on any day to which the hearing is adjourned, the board shall hear and consider any objections presented to the annexation of the territory. After the hearing of objections, if it is determined by a vote of two-thirds of all the members of the board that the territory proposed to be annexed will be benefited by annexation, the board shall proceed to fix and determine the boundaries of the territory to be annexed to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105287.

After making all necessary and proper changes in the boundaries, by a resolution passed by a vote of two-thirds of the members, the board shall order the annexation of the territory so described. The resolution, together with the names of the members of the board voting for and against the same shall be set forth in the minutes of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105288.

Whenever any territory is annexed to the district it shall thereupon become a part of the district subject to all the liabilities and entitled to all the benefits of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Service Zones [105300. - 105310.]

105300.

One or more service zones to provide different levels of service, to provide different facilities or other improvements, or to raise additional revenues within specific areas of the district, may be created within the boundaries of the district. A service zone may consist of one or more cities, with or without unincorporated territory, or unincorporated territory alone.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105301.

(a) Proceedings for the creation of a service zone may be initiated by resolution of the legislative body or bodies of the city or cities proposed to be included in the service zone, and if unincorporated territory is proposed to be included in the service zone, by resolution of the board or boards of supervisors of the county or counties in which the unincorporated territory is situated.

(b) The resolution or resolutions shall declare that the public interest or necessity
 demands the creation of a service zone, shall describe its boundaries, and shall request the formation of the service zone.

(c) When the entire area of a public agency is to be included in the service zone, it may be described by name.

(d) Certified copies of the resolution or resolutions shall be filed with the secretary of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105302.

(a) As an alternative to the initiation of proceedings for the formation of a service zone by resolution or resolutions, a petition may be filed with the secretary of the district signed by voters equal in number to at least 25 percent of the registered voters registered within the proposed service zone as determined from the affidavits of registration. The boundaries of the proposed service zone shall be described in the petition. When the entire area of a public agency is to be included in the service zone, it may be described by
 name.

(b) The petition shall declare that the public interest or necessity demands the creation of a service zone within the area of the district described in the petition. The petition may include one or more separate documents, but each document shall contain the affidavit of the party who circulated it, certifying that each name signed thereto is the true signature of the person whose name it purports to be.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105303.

The secretary of the district shall compare the signatures in the petition with the affidavits of registration on file with the county election official. The secretary of the district also shall certify to the sufficiency or insufficiency of the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 296, Sec. 42.1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

105304.

(a) Within 30 days after receipt of the resolution or resolutions of the legislative body or bodies or receipt of the certification of the sufficiency of a petition by the secretary of the district, the board shall initiate proceedings for the formation of a new service zone by adopting a resolution that does all of the following:

(1) States that formation of a service zone has been initiated pursuant to either Section 105301 or 105302.

(2) Sets forth a description of the boundaries of the territory to be included in the service zone.

(3) States the different services, different levels of service, or additional revenues that the service zone will provide.

(4) Sets forth the methods by which those services or levels of service will be financed.

(5) States the reasons for forming the service zone.

(6) Proposes a name or number for the service zone.

(7) Fixes the date, time, and place for the public hearing regarding the formation of the service zone.

(b) The district shall publish notice of the
 hearing, including the information required by subdivision (a), pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code, in one or more newspapers of general circulation in the district. The district shall mail the notice to all owners of property within the proposed service zone. The district shall post the notice in at least three public places within the territory of the proposed service zone.

(c) At the hearing, the board shall hear and consider any protests to the formation of the service zone. At the conclusion of the hearing, the board may adopt a resolution ordering the formation of the service zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105305.

The board may change the boundaries of a service zone or dissolve a zone by following the procedures in Section 105301.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105306.

A local agency formation commission shall have no power or duty to review and approve or disapprove a proposal to create a service zone, a proposal to change the boundaries of a zone, or a proposal to dissolve a zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105307.

As determined by the board, a service zone may provide any service at any level within its boundaries that the district may provide.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105308.

As determined by the board and pursuant to the requirements of this part, a service zone may exercise any fiscal powers within its boundaries that the district may exercise.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105309.

Any taxes, special taxes, assessments, or fees which are intended solely for the support of services within a zone shall be levied, assessed, and collected only within the boundaries of the zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105310.

To assist in the operation of a service zone, the board may appoint one or more advisory groups composed of persons who reside in or own property in the zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Dissolution [105330. - 105337.]

105330.

If the district operates no rail transit facilities, the board may call an election at any time for the purpose of submitting to the voters of the district the question of whether the district shall be dissolved. Upon the filing with the secretary of the district of a petition signed by voters within the district equal in number to at least 25 percent of the total vote cast at the last general statewide election, asking that the question of dissolution of the district be submitted to the voters of the district, the board shall call the
 election.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105331.

The election for the purpose of submitting to the voters of the district the question of whether or not the district shall be dissolved shall be held within 60 days following the date on which the petition is filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105332.

Notice of any election for dissolution, whether called because of the filing of a petition or ordered by the board without petition, shall be published. The date fixed for the election shall not be less than 30 days from the date of the first publication of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105333.

The ballots for the election shall contain substantially the instructions required to be printed on ballots for use at general state and county elections and, in addition, the following: Shall the Sonoma-Marin Area Rail Transit District be dissolved?YESNO

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105334.

The board shall canvass the vote. If a majority of the votes favor dissolution, the board shall by resolution dissolve the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105335.

The board shall file a certified copy of the resolution with the Secretary of State and for record in the office of the county recorder of the Counties of Marin and Sonoma and any other county in which territory of the district is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

105336.

Upon dissolution, the right, title, and interest to any property owned or controlled by the district that was acquired by the district from the Golden Gate Bridge, Highway and Transportation District shall be returned to the Golden Gate Bridge, Highway and Transportation District or disposed of as designated by the Golden Gate Bridge, Highway and Transportation District. It is the intent of the Legislature that any remaining property continue to be held in public ownership. A joint powers agency, members of which may include the Counties of Marin and Sonoma and the Golden Gate Bridge,
 Highway and Transportation District, may be formed to hold title to the remaining district property. If a joint powers agency cannot be formed, the district, in consultation with the Counties of Humboldt, Marin, Mendocino, and Sonoma, and the Golden Gate Bridge, Highway and Transportation District, shall make a recommendation to the Legislature regarding an appropriate disposition of the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 866, Sec. 9.   (SB 904)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

105337.

The board shall wind up the affairs of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 341, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 17. Monterey-Salinas Transit District [106000. - 106064.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [106000. - 106001.]

106000.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Monterey-Salinas Transit District Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

106001.

As used in this part, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Agency” means the Monterey-Salinas Transit Joint Powers Agency, a joint exercise of powers agency.

(b) “Board of directors” or “board” means the Board of Directors of the Monterey-Salinas Transit District.

(c) “Board
 of supervisors” means the Monterey County Board of Supervisors.

(d) “County” means Monterey County.

(e) “District” means the Monterey-Salinas Transit District created by Section 106010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Formation of District [106010. - 106013.]

106010.

There is hereby created the Monterey-Salinas Transit District. The jurisdiction of the district extends throughout the county, including all of the incorporated and unincorporated territory.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

106011.

On and after July 1, 2010, the agency is dissolved and the district succeeds to, and is vested with, all of the rights, powers, duties, and obligations of the agency. The district is the successor to the agency’s interests in any property, its rights and obligations under any contract, any outstanding indebtedness of the agency, and its rights under any grants, without the necessity of any further action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

106012.

(a) The district shall assume the duties of public transit provider performed by the agency. On and after July 1, 2010, the Cities of Carmel-by-the-Sea, Del Rey Oaks, Marina, Monterey, Pacific Grove, Salinas, Seaside, Gonzales, Soledad, Greenfield, King City, Sand City, the County of Monterey, and other jurisdictions that subsequently qualify as members pursuant to the requirements set forth in Section 106020 are included within the district.

(b) Additionally, the district is deemed to be, with all of the powers and duties attendant thereto, the consolidated transportation services agency for the county, with the concurrence of the regional transportation planning agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

106013.

Upon dissolution of the agency, employees of the agency shall be deemed to be employees of the district without any break in service or any loss or reduction of compensation or benefits, except as may be imposed by express action of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Government of District [106020. - 106033.]



  ARTICLE 1. Board of Directors [106020. - 106023.]

106020.

(a) The district shall be governed by a board of directors which shall be composed of one representative from each member jurisdiction. Each member of the board of directors shall have one vote. Each member jurisdiction shall appoint one regular member and one alternate member to the board of directors and shall notify the district in writing of its appointments or any change of representative.

(b) Membership of the district shall be limited to the County of Monterey and incorporated cities within the county and includes the county and each city that gives the district the right of first priority for use of any local, state, or federal funds allocated specifically for public transit systems and to which the city member might otherwise be entitled to claim as, but not limited to, local transportation funds pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 99200) of Part 11. The county shall give the district the right of first priority of use of any local, state, or federal funds allocated specifically for public transit to which the county might otherwise be entitled to claim as, but not limited to, local transportation funds pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 99200) of Part 11 according to a ratio of unincorporated population within three-quarters of a mile of the district transit routes to the total unincorporated population of the county.

(c) Each member shall serve solely at the pleasure of the appointing member jurisdiction. Members shall be either elected officials or officers or employees of the appointing member jurisdiction.

(d) If any portion of the unincorporated area of the county is annexed to a member city, that city shall assume the obligation of the county for that area. If any portion of the unincorporated area of the county becomes incorporated, that city shall assume the obligations of the county for that area.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

106021.

The board shall adopt bylaws for its proceedings consistent with the laws of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

106022.

The board shall do all of the following:

(a) Adopt an annual budget.

(b) Adopt an administrative code, by ordinance, which prescribes the powers and duties of the district officers, the method of appointment of the district employees, and methods, procedures, and systems of operation and management of the district.

(c) Cause a postaudit of the financial transactions and records of the district to be made at least annually by a certified public accountant.

(d) Do any and all things necessary to carry out the purposes of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

106023.

The board of directors shall adopt priorities reflecting the district’s goals.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Meetings [106030. - 106033.]

106030.

The board, at its first meeting, and thereafter annually at the meeting designated by the board, shall elect a chairperson who shall preside at all meetings, and a vice chairperson who shall preside in the absence of the chairperson. In the event of his or her absence or inability to act, the members present, by an order entered in the minutes, shall select one of their members to act as chairperson pro tempore, who, while so acting, shall have all the authority of the
 chairperson.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

106031.

All meetings of the board shall be conducted pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

106032.

A majority of the board of directors entitled to vote constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business. All official acts of the district require the affirmative vote of a majority of the board of directors entitled to vote.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

106033.

The acts of the board shall be expressed by motion, resolution, or ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Powers and Functions of the District [106040. - 106064.]



  ARTICLE 1. Personnel [106040. - 106041.]

106040.

(a) The district may hire an independent staff of its own or contract with any department or agency of the United States or with any public agency to implement this part.

(b) The district may contract with private entities in conformance with applicable procurement procedures for the procurement of engineering, project management, and contract management services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

106041.

The board of directors shall fix the compensation of the district’s officers and employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Annual Budget [106045. - 106045.]

106045.

(a) Notice of the time and place of a public hearing on the adoption of the annual budget shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code not less than 15 days prior to the day of the hearing.

(b) The proposed annual budget shall be available for public inspection at least 15 days prior to the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Corporate Powers [106050. - 106051.]

106050.

The district may sue and be sued, except as otherwise provided by law, in all actions and proceedings, in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

106051.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code, except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Contracts [106055. - 106057.]

106055.

The district may make contracts and enter into stipulations of any nature whatsoever, either in connection with eminent domain proceedings or otherwise, including, but not limited to, contracts and stipulations to indemnify and hold harmless, to employ labor, and to perform all acts necessary and convenient for the full exercise of the powers granted in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

106056.

The district may contract with any department or agency of the United States, with any public agency, including, but not limited to, the Department of Transportation, any county, city, or district, or with any person or a private entity upon the terms and conditions that the district finds in its best interest for the procurement of engineering, project management, and contract management services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

106057.

(a) The purchase of all services, supplies, equipment, and materials, when the expenditure required exceeds one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), shall, by contract, be let to the lowest responsible bidder, or, in the district’s discretion, to the responsible bidder who submitted a proposal that provides the best value to the district on the basis of the factors identified in the solicitation. “Best value” means the overall combination of quality, price, and other elements of a proposal that, when considered together, provide the greatest overall benefit in response to the requirements described in the solicitation documents.

(b) To the extent practicable, the district shall obtain a
 minimum of three quotations, either written or oral, that permit prices and terms to be compared whenever the expected expenditure required for the purchase of services, supplies, equipment, or materials exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000), but does not exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000).

(c) For purposes of this section, the term “services” shall not include construction of public projects, as defined in Section 22002 of the Public Contract Code, or those services described in Section 4525 of the Government Code.

(d) This section shall
 remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 107, Sec. 1.   (SB 304)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 2 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 107.)
-------------------------------------------

106057.

(a) The purchase of all supplies, equipment, and materials, when the expenditure required exceeds one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), shall, by contract, be let to the lowest responsible bidder, or, in the district’s discretion, to the responsible bidder who submitted a proposal that provides the best value to the district on the basis of the factors identified in the solicitation. “Best value” means the overall combination of quality, price, and other elements of a proposal that, when considered together, provide the greatest overall benefit in response to the requirements described in the solicitation documents.

(b) To the extent practicable, the
 district shall obtain a minimum of three quotations, either written or oral, that permit prices and terms to be compared whenever the expected expenditure required for the purchase of supplies, equipment, or materials exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000), but does not exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000).

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2030.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 107, Sec. 2.   (SB 304)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Financing [106060. - 106064.]

106060.

(a) The district has no authority to impose sales or special taxes, but may, with the concurrence of a majority of the member jurisdictions represented on the board of directors, cause to be submitted to voters of the district a ballot measure for the imposition of those taxes. A ballot measure shall not be submitted to the voters of the district pursuant to this subdivision on or after January 1, 2026.

(b) The district, upon the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of the board of directors, may submit to the voters of the district a measure proposing a retail transactions and use tax ordinance in accordance with the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section
 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code).

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the district may impose a transactions and use tax pursuant to Chapter 3.95 (commencing with Section 7300.5) of Part 1.7 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(d) If approved as required by law, the district may impose and administer fees and other funding sources secured for transportation system operation, maintenance, and improvement.

(e) The board of directors may set fares for public transit service by resolution or minute
 order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 706, Sec. 1.   (AB 761)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

106062.

The district may issue bonds not to exceed the amount of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000), payable in whole or in part from revenues of any enterprise acquired, constructed, or completed, or to be acquired, constructed, or completed, by the district, in the manner provided by the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), all of the provisions that apply to the district, except that Article 3 (commencing with 54380) of Chapter 6 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code and the restrictions in that article, including, but not limited to, restrictions on the securing of bonds by the taxing power or the proceeds of taxation, do not apply to the issuance and sale of bonds pursuant to this article and, instead, the district shall authorize the issuance